Arkansas, session 2025, HB1722.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-64-101(16)(B)(vi), concerning the
exclusion from the definition of "marijuana" within the Uniform Controlled
Substances Act, is amended to read as follows:
(vi) Hemp-derived cannabidiol that: Hemp as defined
in § 20-56-501 et seq., or
(a) Contains not more than three-tenths of one
percent (0.3%) of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) on a dry weight basis as
verified by a nationally accredited laboratory for quality, purity, and
accuracy standards; and
(b) Is not approved by the United States Food
and Drug Administration for marketing as a medication;
*JMB422*
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-64-215(a)(2), concerning the substances
in Schedule VI of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, is amended to read
as follows:
(2) Tetrahydrocannabinols, unless the tetrahydrocannabinol is:
(A) Contained in hemp-derived cannabidiol hemp or a hemp-
derived product under § 20-56-501 et seq.;
(B) Not more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) of
delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol in the hemp-derived cannabidiol on a dry weight
basis as verified by a nationally accredited laboratory for quality, purity,
and accuracy standards; and
(C)(B) Not approved Approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration for marketing as a medication;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-64-215(a)(5)(A)(i), concerning the
substances in Schedule VI of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(A)(i) Tetrahydrocannabinols, including without limitation
the following:
(a) Delta-1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol,
otherwise known as a delta-9 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its
optical isomers;
(b) Delta-6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol,
otherwise known as a delta-8 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its
optical isomers; and
(c) Delta-3,4 cis or trans
tetrahydrocannabinol, otherwise known as a delta-6a,10a cis or trans
tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers;
(d) Delta-10 cis or trans
tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers;
(e) Delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol acetate
ester;
(f) Delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol acetate
ester;
(g) Delta-6a,10a tetrahydrocannabinol acetate
ester;
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(h) Delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol acetate
ester;
(i) A product derived from industrial hemp
that was produced as a result of a synthetic chemical process that converted
the industrial hemp or a substance contained in the industrial hemp into
delta-8, delta-9, delta-6a,10a, or delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol including
their respective acetate esters; and
(j) Any other psychoactive substance derived
therein.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 19-6-831, effective until the contingency
in Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, is amended to read as follows:
19-6-831. Arkansas Tobacco Control Revenue Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of the State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special
revenue fund to be known as the “Arkansas Tobacco Control Revenue Fund”.
(b)(1) All permit and license fees received by Arkansas Tobacco
Control under the Arkansas Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, § 26-57-201 et
seq., and § 20-56-501 et seq. shall be deposited into the State Treasury as
special revenues to the credit of the fund.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues authorized
by law.
(c)(1) The fund shall be used for expenses incurred by Arkansas
Tobacco Control in the organization, maintenance, operation, and merchant
education and training with regard to enforcement of § 5-27-227, the Arkansas
Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, § 26-57-201 et seq., § 20-56-501 et seq.,
and the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-701 et seq.
(2) Expenditures of moneys in the fund are subject to the
General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., the
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq., and other applicable fiscal
laws.
(3) The receipts and disbursements of Arkansas Tobacco Control
shall be audited annually by Arkansas Legislative Audit.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 19-6-831, effective if the contingency in
Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, is repealed.
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
19-6-831. Arkansas Tobacco Control Revenue Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of the State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special
revenue fund to be known as the “Arkansas Tobacco Control Revenue Fund”.
(b)(1) All permit and license fees received by Arkansas Tobacco
Control under the Arkansas Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, § 26-57-201 et
seq., and § 20-56-401 et seq., shall be deposited into the State Treasury as
special revenues to the credit of the fund.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues authorized
by law.
(c)(1) The fund shall be used for expenses incurred by Arkansas
Tobacco Control in the organization, maintenance, operation, and merchant
education and training with regard to enforcement of § 5-27-227, the Arkansas
Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, § 26-57-201 et seq., § 20-56-401 et seq.,
and the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-701 et seq.
(2) Expenditures of moneys in the fund are subject to the
General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., the
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq., and other applicable fiscal
laws.
(3) The receipts and disbursements of Arkansas Tobacco Control
shall be audited annually by Arkansas Legislative Audit.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 56, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 5 - Hemp-Derived Products

20-56-501. Purpose.
It is the intent of this subchapter to provide regulation of hemp-
derived products to:
(1) Assure that when hemp-derived products are distributed in
this state, they are not contaminated and are distributed only to persons
authorized to receive hemp-derived products;
(2) Protect and promote the public health and welfare of the
residents of this state;
(3) Provide for the close supervision and control of the
permitting of persons to sell hemp and hemp-derived products in this state to
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
ensure that hemp and hemp-derived products are fresh, not contaminated, and
are properly taxed, stamped, stored, and distributed only to persons
authorized to receive hemp and hemp-derived products in this state;
(4) Impose permits, fees, taxes, and restrictions on the
privilege of dealing in or otherwise doing business in hemp and hemp-derived
products in order to promote the public health and welfare of the residents
of this state and to protect the revenue collection procedures incorporated
within this subchapter; and
(5) Create a three-tiered system of a manufacturer, wholesaler,
and retailer of hemp and hemp-derived products.

20-56-502. Applicability.
(a) This subchapter does not permit a person to:
(1) Undertake a task under the influence of hemp-derived
products when doing so would constitute negligence or professional
malpractice; or
(2) Possess, smoke, or otherwise engage in the use of hemp or
hemp-derived products:
(A) On a school bus;
(B) On the grounds of a daycare center, preschool, primary
or secondary school, college, or university;
(C) At a drug or alcohol treatment facility;
(D) At a community or recreation center;
(E) In a correctional facility;
(F) On any form of public transportation; or
(G) On any property that is under control of the Arkansas
National Guard or the United States military; or
(H) In the operation, navigation, or actual physical
control of a motor vehicle, aircraft, motorized watercraft, or any other
vehicle drawn by power other than muscle power while under the influence of
hemp-derived products.
(b) This subchapter does not require:
(1) An employer to accommodate the ingestion of hemp-derived
products in a workplace or an employee working while under the influence of
hemp-derived products;
(2) An individual or establishment in lawful possession of
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
property to allow a guest, client, customer, or other visitor to use hemp-
derived products on or in that property; or
(3) An individual or establishment in lawful possession of
property to admit a guest, client, customer, or other visitor who is
inebriated as a result of his or her use of hemp-derived products.

20-56-503. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Annual" or "annually" means the fiscal year from July 1
through the next June 30;
(2) "Approved laboratory" means a laboratory that is accredited
by the National Institute on Drug Abuse, the National Environmental
Laboratory Accreditation Conference, the International Organization for
Standardization or similar accrediting entity as determined by Arkansas
Tobacco Control and that has been approved by the Director of Arkansas
Tobacco Control specifically for the testing of hemp-derived products;
(3) "Consumer" means a member of the public at large;
(4)(A) "Current use of hemp or hemp-derived product" means use
of hemp-derived products that justifies the good faith belief of an employer
that an applicant or employee is engaging in the use of hemp or hemp-derived
product.
(B) "Current use of hemp or hemp-derived product" is
presumed when a positive test result for delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol-9
carboxylic acid, also known as THCA;
(5) "Days" means calendar days unless otherwise specified;
(6) "Employee" means an individual employed by an employer;
(7) "Employer" means an entity that employs one (1) or more
employees or independent contractors;
(8)(A) "Good faith belief" means reasonable reliance on a fact,
or that which is held out to be factual, without intent to deceive or be
deceived and without reckless or malicious disregard for the truth.
(B) "Good faith belief" does not include a belief formed
with gross negligence.
(C) "Good faith belief" may be based on any of the
following:
(i) Observed conduct, behavior, or appearance;
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(ii) Information reported by a person believed to be
reliable, including without limitation a report by a person who witnessed the
use or possession of hemp or hemp-derived products by an applicant or
employee in the workplace;
(iii) Written, electronic, or verbal statements from
the employee or other persons;
(iv) Lawful video surveillance;
(v) A record of a government agency, law enforcement
agency, or court;
(vi) A positive test result for delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol-9 carboxylic acid;
(vii) A warning label, usage standard, or other
printed material that accompany instructions for usable hemp or hemp-derived
products;
(viii) Information from a physician, medical review
officer, or a retailer;
(ix) Information from reputable reference sources in
print or on the internet;
(x) Other information reasonably believed to be
reliable or accurate; or
(xi) Any combination of the items listed in
subdivision (8)(C)(i)-(x) of this section;
(9) "Hemp" means the plant Cannabis sativa and any part of the
plant, including the seeds of the plant, and all derivatives, extracts,
cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or
not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than
three-tenths percent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis;
(10) "Hemp-derived e-liquid product" means a liquid hemp-derived
product that contains hemp that is inhaled when using a vapor product, and
that may or may not include without limitation propylene glycol, vegetable
glycerin, and flavorings;
(11)(A) "Hemp-derived product" means a product intended for
human consumption including consumption by vapor inhalation as defined in
this subchapter, or a component of a product, that is derived from hemp,
including all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and
salts of isomers, and any product made from such derivatives.
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(B) "Hemp-derived product" includes a hemp-derived e-
liquid product and a vapor product.
(C) "Hemp-derived product" does not include:
(i) A product intended for animal consumption or
use;
(ii) A cosmetic as defined by § 20-56-202;
(iii) Any marijuana, medical marijuana, or other
cannabis product containing delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol greater than three-
tenths percent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis as administered, licensed, and
otherwise regulated by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, the Medical
Marijuana Commission, and the Department of Health under the Arkansas Medical
Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98;
(iv) A raw hemp product, including any intact plant,
flower, buds, leaves, or stems;
(v) A drug in the form for which an application
filed in accordance with 21 U.S.C. § 355 is approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration;
(vi) A dietary supplement as defined by the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.; or
(vii) A fabric, textile, cordage, fiber, fuel,
paper, construction material, plastic, seed, seed meal, and seed oil;
(12)(A) "Manufacturer" means a person that manufactures,
fabricates, assembles, or processes a hemp-derived product, including without
limitation federally licensed importers and federally licensed distributors
that deal in hemp-derived products.
(B) "Manufacturer" includes:
(i) An entity representing the manufacturer with
regard to the sale of hemp-derived products produced by the manufacturer to
wholesalers or permitted retailers; and
(ii) A person that mixes, compounds, extracts,
infuses, blends, processes, repackages, or resizes hemp-derived products
including the extraction of cannabinoids from hemp biomass.
(C) "Manufacturer" does not include a person that engages
in the agricultural production of hemp, such as growing, planting, and
harvesting of raw hemp biomass regulated by the State Plant Board;
(13) "Minor" means a person who is under twenty-one (21) years
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
of age;
(14) "Person" means an individual, retailer, wholesaler,
manufacturer, firm, association, company, partnership, limited liability
company, corporation, joint-stock company, club, agency, syndicate, the State
of Arkansas, county, municipal corporation or other political subdivision of
the state, receiver, trustee, fiduciary, or trade association;
(15) "Place of business" means the physical location:
(A) Where orders for hemp-derived products are taken or
received or where hemp-derived products are sold; and
(B) That is on file with Arkansas Tobacco Control;
(16) "Positive test result" means a result that is at or above
the cutoff concentration level established by the United States Department of
Transportation or state laws regarding being under the influence of delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol, whichever is lower;
(17) "Retailer" means a person that purchases hemp-derived
products from permitted wholesalers for the purpose of selling the hemp-
derived products in person and over the counter at retail to consumers;
(18)(A) "Safety sensitive position" means any position involving
a safety sensitive function under federal regulations governing drug and
alcohol testing adopted by the United States Department of Transportation or
any other rules, guidelines, or regulations adopted by any other federal or
state agency.
(B) "Safety sensitive position" also means any position
designated in writing by an employer as a safety sensitive position in which
a person performing the position while under the influence of hemp-derived
products may constitute a threat to health or safety, including without
limitation a position:
(i) That requires any of the following activities:
(a) Carrying a firearm;
(b) Performing life-threatening procedures;
(c) Working with confidential information or
documents pertaining to criminal investigations; or
(d) Working with hazardous or flammable
materials, controlled substances, food, or medicine; or
(ii) In which a lapse of attention could result in
injury, illness, or death, including without limitation a position that
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
includes the operating, repairing, maintaining, or monitoring of heavy
equipment, machinery, aircraft, motorized watercraft, or motor vehicles as
part of the job duties;
(19)(A) "Sale" or "sell" means a transfer, exchange, or barter
in any manner or by any means for any consideration, including distributing
or shipping hemp-derived product in connection with a sale.
(B) A sale "in" or "into" a state refers to the state in
which the destination point of the hemp-derived product is located in the
sale without regard to where title was transferred.
(C) A sale "from" a state refers to the sale of a hemp-
derived product that is located in that state to the destination in question
without regard to where title was transferred;
(20) "Self-service display" means a display:
(A) That contains a hemp-derived product, or any component
of a hemp-derived product;
(B) That is located in an area where customers are
permitted; and
(C) In which the hemp-derived product, or any component of
a hemp-derived product is readily accessible to a customer without the
assistance of a salesperson;
(21) "Tetrahydrocannabinol" means a compound that is the
natural, primary active cannabinoid substance or its equivalent contained in
the plant of the genus cannabis or in the resinous extracts of the plant,
including derivatives or isomers derived from such cannabinoids;
(22)(A) "Under the influence" means symptoms of the current use
of hemp or hemp-derived products that may negatively impact the performance
of job duties or tasks or constitute a threat to health or safety.
(B) "Under the influence" includes without limitation:
(i) Symptoms of the applicant's or employee's
speech, walking, standing, physical dexterity, agility, coordination,
actions, movement, demeanor, appearance, clothing, odor, or other irrational
or unusual behavior that are inconsistent with the usual conduct of the
applicant or employee;
(ii) Negligence or carelessness in operating
equipment, machinery, or production or manufacturing processes;
(iii) Disregard for safety;
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(iv) Involvement in an accident that results in:
(a) Damage to equipment, machinery, or
property;
(b) Disruption of a production or
manufacturing process; or
(c) An injury; or
(v) Other symptoms causing a reasonable suspicion
that the current use of hemp or hemp-derived products may negatively impact
the performance of job duties or tasks or constitute a threat to health or
safety;
(23) "Vapor product" means a hemp-derived product that is an
electronic oral device of any size or shape that contains a vapor of hemp or
hemp-derived e-liquid product that when used or inhaled simulates smoking,
regardless of whether a visible vapor is produced, including without
limitation a device that:
(A) Is composed of a heating element, battery, electronic
circuit, chemical process, mechanical device, or a combination of heating
element, battery, electronic circuit, chemical process, or mechanical device;
(B) Works in combination with a cartridge, other
container, or liquid delivery device containing hemp or hemp-derived e-liquid
product and manufactured for use with vapor products;
(C) Is manufactured, distributed, marketed, or sold as any
type or derivation of a vapor product, e-cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe, or any
other produced name or descriptor; and
(D) Does not include a product regulated as a drug or
device by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.,
as it existed on January 1, 2015;
(24) "Warehouse" means a place where hemp-derived products are
stored for another person and to or from which place the hemp-derived
products are shipped or delivered upon order by the owner of the hemp-derived
products to the warehouse; and
(27) "Wholesaler" means a person that:
(A) Does business within the state;
(B) Purchases hemp-derived products from any source;
(C) Distributes or sells the hemp-derived products to
other wholesalers or retailers; and
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(D) Does not distribute or sell the tobacco products,
vapor products, alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid products at retail
to consumers.

20-56-504. Construction — Prohibitions.
(a) A hemp-derived product shall not be delivered, sold, or otherwise
distributed in this state except in conformity with all applicable laws and
regulations, including this subchapter and rules promulgated under this
subchapter.
(b) A person shall not sell, deal with, deliver, cause to be delivered
to a retailer or consumer, or otherwise do business in hemp-derived products
without first registering with the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control and
obtaining a permit for that purpose.
(c) A product intended for human consumption or inhalation that is
derived from hemp and contains tetrahydrocannabinol shall not be permitted or
allowed under the laws of this state, other than hemp-derived products.
(d) A hemp-derived product shall be prepackaged and shelf stable.
(e) A hemp-derived product shall not contain or include any of the
following:
(1) Alcoholic beverages, including without limitation beer,
wine, intoxicating liquor, or any other alcoholic beverage as defined by the
Arkansas Alcoholic Control Act, § 3-1-101 et seq., and § 3-5-202;
(2) Products containing nicotine or tobacco;
(3) Inhalable products or other products labeled or advertised
for the purpose of smoking or in the form of a cigarette, cigar, or pre-roll,
or packaged or combined with other items designed to facilitate smoking such
as rolling papers or pipes, except hemp-derived e-liquid products; or
(4) Medical devices, prescription drugs, or drugs otherwise
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
(f) The business of handling, receiving, possessing, storing,
distributing, taking orders for, soliciting orders of, selling, offering for
sale, and dealing in, through sale, barter, or exchange, hemp-derived
products is declared to be a privilege under the laws of the State of
Arkansas.

20-56-505. Permits.
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(a)(1) Each person listed in this section, before commencing business,
or if already in business, before continuing business, shall pay an annual
privilege fee and secure a permit from the Director of Arkansas Tobacco
Control.
(2) A person purchasing an existing permitted retail location
may, with the permission of the seller and Arkansas Tobacco Control, operate
under the selling owner's permit for no more than thirty (30) days from the
date of the sale.
(b)(1) In addition to securing a permit under subsection (a) of this
section, a manufacturer whose products are sold in this state shall register
the business with the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration.
(2) A wholesaler of hemp-derived products shall secure the
proper wholesale permit.
(3) Every retailer of hemp-derived products that operates a
place of business shall secure the proper retail permit.
(4) Before issuing a manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer
permit, Arkansas Tobacco Control shall determine that the permit is not being
issued in violation of prohibitions under § 20-56-506.
(c)(1) Permits shall be issued as follows:
(A) A permit for a sole proprietorship is issued in the
owner's name and in the fictitious business name, if any;
(B)(i) A permit for a partnership or limited liability
company is issued in the name of:
(a) The managing partner or managing member;
and
(b) The partnership or limited liability
company.
(ii) If the managing partner or managing member of a
limited liability company is a partnership, limited liability company, or
corporation, then the permit shall be issued in the name of:
(a) The president or chief executive officer;
and
(b) The partnership or limited liability
company; and
(C) A permit for a publicly traded or nonpublicly traded
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
corporation is issued in the name of the president or chief executive officer
of the corporation and in the name of the corporation.
(2) It is a violation for a permitted entity not to provide
written notification to the director within thirty (30) days of a change in
the following:
(A) The managing member of a partnership, managing member
of a limited liability company, or president or chief executive officer of a
corporation, partnership, or limited liability company; or
(B) The stockholders effecting twenty-five percent (25%)
or more of the total voting shares of a nonpublicly traded corporation.
(d)(1) When an entity transfers a business permitted under this
subchapter, the entity to which the business is transferred:
(A) Shall apply for a new permit under this subchapter;
(B) May be issued a new permit under this subchapter; and
(C) May operate under the selling entity's permit for no
more than thirty (30) days from the date of the sale.
(2) When a partnership or limited liability company permitted
under this subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the managing partner,
managing member, president, or chief executive officer:
(A) The existing permit issued under this subchapter is
void; and
(B) The partnership or limited liability company:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no
more than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or
replacement of the managing member of a partnership, managing member of a
limited liability company, or president or chief executive officer of a
corporation, partnership, or limited liability company.
(3) When a nonpublicly traded corporation permitted under this
subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the president or chief executive
officer named on the permit or changes, removes, or replaces a stockholder
who owns fifty percent (50%) or more of the total voting shares of the
nonpublicly traded corporation's stock:
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(A) The permit issued under this subchapter is void; and
(B) The nonpublicly traded corporation:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no
more than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or
replacement of the president, chief executive officer, or stockholder.
(4) When a publicly traded corporation permitted under this
subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the president or chief executive
officer named on the permit or changes, removes, or replaces a stockholder
who owns fifty percent (50%) or more of the total voting shares of the
publicly traded corporation's stock:
(A) The permit issued under this subchapter is void; and
(B) The publicly traded corporation:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no
more than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or
replacement of the president, chief executive officer, or stockholder.
(e) An entity may apply for and be issued a permit under this
subchapter in advance of the effective date of the permit to facilitate
continuity of business operations.

20-56-506. Permits - Limitation of interests
(a)(1) A person with an ownership, equity, or management interest in a
permitted wholesaler may also have an ownership, equity, or management
interest in a permitted retailer, but shall not have any ownership, equity,
or management interest in a manufacturer.
(2) A person with an ownership, equity, or management interest
in a permitted retailer may also have an ownership, equity, or management
interest in a permitted wholesaler, but a retailer shall not have any
ownership, equity, or management interest in a manufacturer.
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(3) A person with an ownership, equity, or management interest
in a permitted manufacturer shall not have any ownership, equity, or
management interest in a permitted wholesaler or retailer.
(b) A management company shall not manage a permitted manufacturer and
a permitted wholesaler or retailer simultaneously.
(c) A permit to manufacture hemp-derived products shall not be issued
to any person with an ownership, equity, or management interest in either a
wholesaler or retailer.

20-56-507. Permits — Location — Background check required.
(a)(1) A retail, wholesale, or manufacturer permit shall not be issued
to a residential address, a mobile structure or vehicle, or for an address
not zoned appropriately for the business seeking to secure the permit.
(2) A retail or wholesale permit may be issued to a person who
currently holds a retail or wholesale permit if the locations are different.
(b) A permit shall not be issued to:
(1) A person who has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or
been found guilty of a felony; or
(2) A business owned or operated, in whole or in part, by a
person who has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty of a
felony.
(c) Arkansas Tobacco Control shall conduct a criminal background check
on each permit applicant and application, utilizing its Arkansas Crime
Information Center access as a law enforcement agency, in accordance with §§
12-12-1008 — 12-12-1011.

20-56-508. Permits — Annual privilege fees.
(a) The annual privilege fee for each permit authorized by this
subchapter is established as follows:
(1) Wholesale Hemp-derived Products Permit .............. $1,000
(2) Retail Hemp-derived Products Permit ................... $100
(3) Manufacturer Hemp-derived Products Permit .......... $10,000
(b)(1) All permits issued under this subchapter shall expire on June
30 following the effective date of issuance.
(2)(A) Upon the failure to renew timely a permit issued under
this subchapter, a late fee of two (2) times the amount of the appropriate
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
permit fee shall be owed in addition to the annual privilege fee for the
renewal of the permit.
(B) An expired permit that is not renewed before September
1 following the expiration of the permit shall not be renewed, and the holder
of the expired permit shall submit an application for a new permit.
(3) A permit shall not be issued to the applicant until the late
fee and the permit fee have been paid.
(c) A permit issued under this subchapter shall not be renewed for a
permit holder who is delinquent more than ninety (90) days on a privilege
fee, tax relating to the sale or dispensing of hemp-derived products, or any
other state and local tax due the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration.
(d) A person who is delinquent more than ninety (90) days on a state
or local tax may not renew or obtain a permit issued under this subchapter
except upon certification that the permit holder has entered into a repayment
agreement with the Department of Finance and Administration and is current on
the payments.
(e) A permit holder who has unpaid fees, civil penalties, or an
unserved permit suspension may not transfer, sell, or give hemp-derived
product inventory of the business associated with the permit to a third party
until all fees and civil penalties are paid in full and all suspensions are
completed successfully, nor shall any third party be issued a new permit for
the business location.
(f) Each manufacturer and wholesaler shall retain copies of all
invoices for the purchase or sale of any hemp-derived products for a period
of at least three (3) years subject to examination by the secretary and the
Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control or their authorized agents upon demand
at any time during regular business hours.
(g) A retailer shall:
(1) Maintain copies of at least the last ninety (90) days of
hemp-derived product invoices, which the retailer shall provide immediately
upon demand;
(2)(A) Make the invoices that are older than ninety (90) days
available upon demand at any time during regular business hours in the retail
store.
(B) Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2)(C) of this
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
section, an agent of Arkansas Tobacco Control may determine a reasonable time
frame for which invoices are to be provided under subdivision (g)(2)(A) of
this section.
(C) An invoice that is provided seventy-two (72) hours or
more after the demand shall not be considered for purposes of determining a
violation of this subsection;
(3) Retain invoices for all hemp-derived products in the retail
store even if the invoice for the hemp-derived products is older than three
(3) years;
(4) Maintain a copy of the signed server awareness forms for
each employee of the retailer who engages in the sale of hemp-derived
products, which the retailer shall provide immediately upon demand;
(5)(A) Maintain a copy of any complete transfer forms showing:
(i) The hemp-derived products that were transferred;
(ii) The permitted location from which the hemp-
derived products were transferred; and
(iii) When the transfer occurred.
(B) A transfer form shall be completed contemporaneously
with the transfer and shall be provided immediately by the retailer upon
demand; and
(6) If any inventory was submitted with a permit application,
maintain a copy of the submitted inventory form, which the retailer shall
provide immediately upon demand.
(h) A wholesaler and manufacturer shall:
(1) Maintain three (3) years of hemp-derived product invoices
that are available upon demand during regular business hours in the permitted
location; and
(2) Permit Arkansas Tobacco Control and authorized personnel of
Arkansas Tobacco Control to enter into and inspect stock of hemp-derived
products, and any documents and records relating to receipts and
disbursements of hemp-derived products.
(i) An invoice from a wholesaler to a retailer shall contain the name
or other identifying information of the wholesaler and the retailer.
(j)(1) A nonresident wholesaler shall also keep a record of all hemp-
derived products purchased for distribution within this state.
(2) All books, records, and memoranda pertaining to the purchase
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
and sale of the hemp-derived products under subdivision (j)(1) of this
section shall be subject to inspection by Arkansas Tobacco Control.
(k) Authorized personnel of Arkansas Tobacco Control shall not release
to the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board or to the public any information
identifying customers of the manufacturer, wholesaler, or warehouse except
when necessary to notify the board of alleged violations of this subchapter.

20-56-509. Permits — Not transferable — Duplicates.
(a) A permit under this subchapter is not transferable to a:
(1) Subsequent owner or operator; or
(2) Different physical location unless the permit holder obtains
permission from the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control.
(b) A person purchasing an existing permitted retail location may
operate under the selling owner's permit for no more than thirty (30) days
from the date of the sale.
(c) When a permit is lost by a permit holder, a duplicate permit may
be issued upon application and for a fee of five dollars ($5.00) when
sufficient proof has been provided to the director.

20-56-510. Permits — Suspension or revocation.
(a) All permits issued under this subchapter may be suspended or
revoked by the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control for any violation of this
subchapter or the rules pertaining to this subchapter, subject to a hearing
before the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board at the next regularly scheduled
board meeting.
(b) The director may revoke all permits to deal in hemp-derived
products associated with any person who is convicted of or pleads guilty or
nolo contendere to a criminal violation of this subchapter, subject to a
hearing before the board at the next regularly scheduled board meeting.
(c)(1) The director shall revoke all permits to manufacture hemp-
derived products associated with any person who acquires in any contractual
or de facto ownership, equity, or management interest or control in a
wholesaler or retailer of hemp-derived products simultaneously with the
permit to manufacture hemp-derived products.
(2) The director’s decision to revoke a permit may be appealed
to the board within thirty (30) calendar days of receiving notice of the
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
permit revocation.

20-56-511. Advertising prohibitions and packaging requirements.
(a) A hemp-derived product distributed or offered for sale in this
state shall include the following information on the product label or product
packaging:
(1) The name of the hemp-derived product manufacturer, whether
in-state or out-of-state, and distributor, whether in-state or out-of-state;
(2) Product labeling clearly showing that the product contains
material derived from hemp and not marijuana or medical marijuana; and
(3) Any other marking, words, statement, or symbol as required
by Arkansas Tobacco Control by rule.
(b) A person shall not advertise, market, or offer for sale in this
state any hemp-derived product by using, in the labeling or design of the
product, its packaging, or in its advertising or marketing materials, trade
dress, trademarks, branding, or other related imagery that:
(1) Imitates or replicates those of food brands or other related
products that are marketed to or are commonly associated with children or
minors, including without limitation breakfast cereal, cookies, juice drinks,
frozen drinks, ice creams, sorbets, sherbets, and frozen pops;
(2) Depicts or signifies characters or symbols that are known to
a reasonable person to appeal primarily to or are commonly associated with
children or minors, including without limitation superheroes, cartoons or
cartoon characters, including anime characters, comic book characters, video
game characters, television show characters, movie characters, mythical
creatures, unicorns, or that otherwise incorporates related imagery or
scenery; or
(3) Uses the terms "candy", "candies", “cake",” “cakes", “pies",
or “cupcakes” or any variant of these terms, or any other term referencing a
type or brand of candy, cakes, pastries, or pies, including types or brands
of candy, cakes, pastries, or pies that do not include the words "candy",
"candies", “cake", “cakes", “pies", or “cupcakes” in their names, labels, or
slogans.

20-56-512. Testing.
(a) All hemp-derived products sold in this state shall be tested by an
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
approved laboratory.
(b) An approved laboratory shall be an independent third-party
laboratory.
(c) A hemp-derived product sold in this state shall be tested for the
following and marked as to the hemp-derived product chemical makeup before
being sold to consumers:
(1) Cannabinoid profile;
(2) Solvents;
(3) Pesticides;
(4) Microbials;
(5) Heavy metals; and
(6) Foreign matter.
(d) A hemp-derived product shall not be distributed or sold in this
state without a certificate of analysis from an approved laboratory that
confirms:
(1) The hemp-derived product was tested by an approved
laboratory;
(2) A tested representative sample of the hemp-derived product
contained a total tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that did not exceed
three-tenths percent (0.3%) under this subchapter; and
(3) A detailed analysis and list of the chemical makeup of the
tested hemp-derived product under subsection (c) of this section.
(e) Arkansas Tobacco Control may periodically sample, analyze, and
test any hemp-derived product located in this state.
(f) The Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control may:
(1) Investigate and issue subpoenas to any permittee or approved
laboratory used by a permittee that the director has reasonable suspicion of
intentionally producing falsified test results on hemp-derived products; and
(2) Promulgate rules for the enforcement of this section and set
penalties for any violation of the rules.

20-56-513. Providing minors with hemp-derived products — Purchase,
use, or possession prohibited.
(a)(1) It is unlawful for a person to give, barter, or sell to a minor
a hemp-derived product.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(3) of this section, a
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
person who pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of
violating subdivision (a)(1) of this section is guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
(3) An employee or owner of a retail location permitted under
this subchapter who violates subdivision (a)(1) of this section while inside
the retail location upon conviction is subject to a fine not to exceed one
hundred dollars ($100) per violation.
(b)(1) It is unlawful for a minor to:
(A) Use or possess or to purchase or attempt to purchase a
hemp-derived product; or
(B) For the purpose of obtaining or attempting to obtain a
hemp-derived product, falsely represent himself or herself not to be a minor
by displaying proof of age that is false, fraudulent, or not actually proof
of the minor's age.
(2) Any hemp-derived product found in the possession of a minor
may be confiscated and destroyed by a law enforcement officer.
(c)(1) It is not an offense under subsection (b) of this section if:
(A) The minor was acting at the direction of an authorized
agent of Arkansas Tobacco Control to enforce or ensure compliance with laws
relating to the prohibition of the sale of hemp-derived product to minors;
(B) The minor was acting at the direction of an authorized
agent of the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the
Department of Human Services to compile statistical data relating to the sale
of hemp-derived products to minors;
(C) The minor was acting at the request of a permit holder
to assist the permit holder by performing a check on the permit holder's own
retail business to see if the permit holder's employees would sell hemp-
derived products to the minor; or
(D) The minor was acting as an agent of a retail permit
holder within the scope of employment.
(2) A minor performing activities under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section shall:
(A) Display the appearance of a minor;
(B) Have the written consent of the minor's parent or
guardian to perform the activity on file with the agency utilizing the minor;
and
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(C)(i) Present a true and correct identification if asked.
(ii) Any failure on the part of a minor to provide
true and correct identification upon request is a defense to any action under
this section or a civil action under § 26-57-256.
(d) A person who sells hemp-derived products has the right to deny the
sale of a hemp-derived product to a person.
(e) It is unlawful for a person who has been issued a permit or a
license under this subchapter to fail to display in a conspicuous place a
sign indicating that the sale of hemp-derived products to or purchase or
possession of hemp-derived products by a minor is prohibited by law.
(f) It is unlawful for a manufacturer whose hemp-derived product is
distributed in this state and any person who has been issued a permit or
license under this subchapter to distribute a free sample of a hemp-derived
product, or any component of a hemp-derived product or coupon that entitles
the holder of the coupon to a free sample of any hemp-derived product, or any
component of a hemp-derived product:
(1) In or on any public street or sidewalk within five hundred
feet (500') of a playground, public school, or other facility when the
playground, public school, or other facility is being used primarily by
minors for recreational, educational, or other purposes; or
(2) To a minor.
(g) It is unlawful for a person that has been issued a permit or
license under this subchapter to:
(1) Sell or distribute a hemp-derived product through a self-
service display, a vending machine, or an order executed solely over the
internet or similar means; or
(2) Advertise or promote hemp-derived products in a manner that
is intended to appeal to children.
(h) A retail permit holder or license holder who violates a provision
in this section is subject to penalties under § 26-57-256.
(i)(1) A notice of an alleged violation of this section shall be given
to the holder of a retail permit or license or an agent of the holder within
ten (10) days of the alleged violation.
(2)(A) The notice under subdivision (i)(1) of this section shall
contain the date and time of the alleged violation.
(B)(i) The notice under subdivision (i)(1) of this section
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
shall also include either the name of the person making the alleged sale or
information reasonably necessary to determine the location in the store that
allegedly made the sale.
(ii) When appropriate, information under subdivision
(i)(2)(B)(i) of this section should include without limitation the:
(a) Cash register number of the sale in the
store;
(b) Physical location of the sale in the
store; and
(c) If possible, the lane or aisle number of
the sale in the store.
(j) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (h) of this section,
when reviewing for a possible violation, a court shall consider whether:
(1) The business has adopted and enforced a written policy
against selling hemp-derived products to minors;
(2) The business has informed its employees of the applicable
laws regarding the sale of hemp-derived products to minors;
(3) The business has required employees to verify the age of a
customer attempting to purchase a hemp-derived product by way of photographic
identification;
(4) The business has established and imposed disciplinary
sanctions for noncompliance; and
(5) The appearance of the purchaser of the hemp-derived product
was such that an ordinary prudent person would believe him or her to be of
legal age to make the purchase.
(k) A person convicted of violating a provision of this section whose
permit or license to distribute or sell a hemp-derived product is suspended
or revoked upon conviction shall surrender to the court any permit or license
to distribute or sell a hemp-derived product, and the court shall transmit
the permit or license to distribute or sell a hemp-derived product to the
Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control:
(1) To suspend or revoke the person's permit or license to
distribute or sell a hemp-derived product and to not renew the permit or
license; and
(2) Not to issue a new permit or license to that person for the
period of time determined by the court in accordance with this section.
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722

20-56-514. Penalties.
(a) A person within the jurisdiction of this state who is not
permitted to sell, deliver, or cause to be delivered hemp-derived products to
retailers or consumers and who sells, takes orders from, delivers, or causes
to be delivered immediately or in the future a hemp-derived products to
retailers or consumers, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) A person engaged in buying, selling, or otherwise doing business
in hemp-derived products in this state without first obtaining the proper
permit upon conviction is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

20-56-515. Purchases from unregistered, unpermitted dealers unlawful.
(a) It is unlawful for a retailer of hemp-derived products to purchase
hemp-derived products from a person other than a permitted manufacturer,
permitted wholesaler, or other permitted retailer.
(b) A retailer violating this subchapter upon conviction is guilty of
a Class A misdemeanor for each purchase defined in subsection (a) of this
section.

20-56-516. Failure to allow inspection unlawful.
A person who is required to pay taxes or obtain a permit under this
subchapter who fails or refuses to allow the Department of Finance and
Administration or Arkansas Tobacco Control to examine or inspect the person's
inventory of hemp-derived products, invoice books, papers, and memoranda
considered necessary to secure information directly relating to the
enforcement of this subchapter upon conviction is guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor and may have his or her permit immediately suspended by the
Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control, subject to a hearing before the
Arkansas Tobacco Control Board at the next regularly scheduled board meeting.

20-56-517. Wholesalers — Restrictions — Criminal violations.
A wholesaler shall conduct the wholesaler's business subject to the
following restrictions:
(1) The wholesaler shall secure a permit from Arkansas Tobacco
Control; and
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, a
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
wholesaler may sell hemp-derived products only to persons properly permitted
under this subchapter.

20-56-518. Civil and criminal actions.
(a) All civil actions arising under this subchapter shall be brought
by and in the name of the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration or the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control, whichever is
appropriate under the provisions of this subchapter.
(b) All criminal actions shall be brought and prosecuted by the
prosecuting attorney of the county where the criminal action occurred.

20-56-519. No bond for costs required.
A bond for costs is not required of the Department of Finance and
Administration, Arkansas Tobacco Control, or the Arkansas Tobacco Control
Board in any court in this state for the prosecution of a violation of this
subchapter.

20-56-520. Criminal actions — Appeals.
(a) In all prosecutions in the district courts, this state shall have
the same right of appeal to the circuit courts of this state and upon the
same terms as the defendant now has under the law in misdemeanor cases.
(b) When appealed, the cases shall be tried de novo by the circuit
court.

20-56-521. Employer protection.
(a) A cause of action shall not be established against an employer
based upon, and an employer is not prohibited from, any of the following
actions:
(1) Establishing and implementing a substance abuse or drug-free
workplace policy that may include a drug testing program that complies with
state or federal law and taking action with respect to an applicant or
employee under the policy;
(2) Acting on the employer's good faith belief that an employee:
(A) Possessed, smoked, ingested, or otherwise engaged in
the use of hemp-derived products while on the premises of the employer or
during the hours of employment; or
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(B) Was under the influence of hemp-derived products while
on the premises of the employer or during the hours of employment, provided
that a positive test result for hemp-derived product cannot provide the sole
basis for the employer's good faith belief; or
(3) Acting to exclude an employee from being employed in or
performing a safety sensitive position based on the employer's good faith
belief that the employee was engaged in the current use of a hemp-derived
product.
(b) The authorized or protected actions of an employer under this
section include without limitation:
(1) Implementing, monitoring, or taking measures to assess,
supervise, or control the job performance of an employee;
(2) Reassigning an employee to a different position or job
duties;
(3) Placing an employee on paid or unpaid leave;
(4) Suspending or terminating an employee;
(5) Requiring an employee to successfully complete a substance
abuse program before returning to work;
(6) Refusing to hire an applicant; or
(7) Any combination of the actions listed in subdivisions (b)(1)
— (b)(6) of this section.
(c) This section does not waive the sovereign immunity of this state.

20-56-522. Enforcement — Penalties.
(a) It is the duty of all state, county, and city officers to assist
Arkansas Tobacco Control in enforcing this subchapter.
(b) A person within the jurisdiction of this state who is not
permitted to sell, deliver, or cause to be delivered hemp-derived products to
retailers or consumers and who sells, takes orders from, delivers, or causes
to be delivered immediately or in the future any hemp-derived products to
retailers or consumers, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) A person engaged in buying, selling, or otherwise doing business
in hemp-derived products in this state without first obtaining the proper
permit upon conviction is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

20-56-523. Rules.
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
The Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control and Arkansas Tobacco Control
may promulgate rules for the proper enforcement of their powers and duties
under this subchapter, including without limitation the regulation of
processing, transportation, delivery, sale, and purchase of hemp-derived
products in accordance with this subchapter and the power to levy penalties
for violations of this subchapter.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 56, Subchapter 4, as
amended by Acts 2025, No. 176, § 2, effective if the contingency in Acts
2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, is repealed.
Subchapter 4 — Hemp-Derived Products

20-56-401. Purpose.
It is the intent of this subchapter to provide regulation of certain
hemp-derived products to:
(1) Prevent the sale and use of illicit hemp-based products
within Arkansas; and
(2) Protect and promote the public health and welfare of the
residents of this state.

20-56-402. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Annual” or “annually” means the fiscal year from July 1
through the next June 30;
(2) “Approved laboratory” means a laboratory that is accredited
by the National Institute on Drug Abuse, the National Environmental
Laboratory Accreditation Conference, the International Organization for
Standardization, or a similar accrediting entity as determined by Arkansas
Tobacco Control and that has been approved by the Director of Arkansas
Tobacco Control specifically for the testing of hemp-derived product;
(3) “Consumer” means a member of the public at large;
(4) “Days” means calendar days unless otherwise specified;
(5) “Finished product” means a product intended for consumer use
to be sold at retail;
(6) “Hemp” means the plant Cannabis sativa and any part of the
plant, including the seeds of the plant, that contains a delta-9
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) or
less on a dry-weight basis, and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids,
isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not;
(7) “Hemp-derived e-liquid product” means a liquid hemp-derived
product that contains hemp that is inhaled when using a vapor product, and
that may or may not include without limitation propylene glycol, vegetable
glycerin, and flavorings;
(8)(A) “Hemp-derived product” means a product intended for any
form of human consumption, including consumption by vapor inhalation, or a
component of a product, that is derived from hemp, including all derivatives,
extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, and any
product made from such derivatives, and that contains greater than three-
tenths of one percent (0.3%) tetrahydrocannabinol.
(B) “Hemp-derived product” includes a hemp-derived e-
liquid product and a vapor product.
(C) “Hemp-derived product” does not include:
(i) A product intended for animal consumption or
use;
(ii) A cosmetic as defined by § 20-56-202;
(iii) Any marijuana, medical marijuana, or other
cannabis product containing delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol greater than three-
tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry-weight basis as administered, licensed,
and otherwise regulated by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, the
Medical Marijuana Commission, and the Department of Health under the Arkansas
Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98;
(iv) A raw hemp product, including any intact plant,
flower, buds, leaves, or stems;
(v) A drug in the form for which an application
filed in accordance with 21 U.S.C. § 355 is approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration;
(vi) A dietary supplement as defined by the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.; or
(vii) A fabric, textile, cordage, fiber, fuel, paper,
construction material, plastic, seed, seed meal, and seed oil;
(9)(A) “Manufacturer” means a person that manufactures,
fabricates, assembles, or processes a hemp-derived product, including without
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
limitation federally licensed importers and federally licensed distributors
that deal in hemp-derived products.
(B) “Manufacturer” includes:
(i) A sales entity affiliate of the manufacturer or
any other entity representing the manufacturer with regard to the sale of
hemp-derived products produced by the manufacturer to wholesalers or
permitted retailers; and
(ii) A person that mixes, compounds, extracts,
infuses, blends, processes, repackages, or resizes hemp-derived products
including the extraction of cannabinoids from hemp biomass.
(C) “Manufacturer” does not include a person who engages
in the agricultural production of hemp, such as growing, planting, and
harvesting of raw hemp biomass regulated by the State Plant Board;
(10) “Minor” means a person who is under twenty-one (21) years of
age;
(11) “Person” means an individual, retailer, wholesaler,
manufacturer, firm, association, company, partnership, limited liability
company, corporation, joint-stock company, club, agency, syndicate, the State
of Arkansas, county, municipal corporation or other political subdivision of
the state, receiver, trustee, fiduciary, or trade association;
(12) “Place of business” means the physical location:
(A) Where orders for hemp-derived products are taken or
received or where hemp-derived products are sold; and
(B) That is on file with Arkansas Tobacco Control;
(13) “Retailer” means a person that purchases hemp-derived
products from permitted wholesalers for the purpose of selling the hemp-
derived products in person and over the counter at retail to consumers;
(14)(A) “Sale” or “sell” means a transfer, exchange, or
barter in any manner or by any means for any consideration, including
distributing or shipping hemp-derived product in connection with a sale.
(B) A sale “in” or “into” a state refers to the state in
which the destination point of the hemp-derived product is located in the
sale without regard to where title was transferred.
(C) A sale “from” a state refers to the sale of a hemp-
derived product that is located in that state to the destination in question
without regard to where title was transferred;
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(15) “Self-service display” means a display:
(A) That contains a hemp-derived product, or any component
of a hemp-derived product;
(B) That is located in an area where customers are
permitted; and
(C) In which the hemp-derived product, or any component of
a hemp-derived product, is readily accessible to a customer without the
assistance of a salesperson;
(16) “Tetrahydrocannabinol” means a compound that is the natural,
primary active cannabinoid substance or its equivalent contained in the plant
of the genus cannabis or in the resinous extracts of the plant, including
derivatives or isomers derived from such cannabinoids;
(17) “Vapor product” means hemp-derived product that is an
electronic oral device of any size or shape that contains a vapor of hemp or
hemp-derived e-liquid product that when used or inhaled simulates smoking,
regardless of whether a visible vapor is produced, including without
limitation a device that:
(A) Is composed of a heating element, battery, electronic
circuit, chemical process, mechanical device, or a combination of heating
element, battery, electronic circuit, chemical process, or mechanical device;
(B) Works in combination with a cartridge, other
container, or liquid delivery device containing hemp or hemp-derived e-liquid
product and manufactured for use with vapor products;
(C) Is manufactured, distributed, marketed, or sold as any
type or derivation of a vapor product, e-cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe, or any
other produced name or descriptor; and
(D) Does not include a product regulated as a drug or
device by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.,
as it existed on January 1, 2015;
(18) “Warehouse” means a place where hemp-derived products are
stored for another person and to or from which place the hemp-derived
products are shipped or delivered upon order by the owner of the hemp-derived
products, to the warehouse; and
(19) “Wholesaler” means a person other than a manufacturer or a
person owned or operated by a manufacturer that:
(A) Does business within the state;
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(B) Purchases hemp-derived products from any source;
(C) Distributes or sells the hemp-derived products to
other wholesalers, or retailers; and
(D) Does not distribute or sell the hemp-derived products
at retail to consumers.

20-56-403. Construction.
(a) A hemp-derived product shall not be delivered, sold, bought, or
used in this state except in conformity with all applicable laws and
regulations, including this subchapter and any rules promulgated under this
subchapter.
(b) A person shall not sell a hemp-derived product without being
permitted by Arkansas Tobacco Control.
(c) A product intended for human consumption or inhalation that is
derived from hemp and contains tetrahydrocannabinol shall not be permitted or
allowed under the laws of this state, other than hemp-derived products if
otherwise legal under state law.
(d)(1) A hemp-derived product shall not be combined with or contain
any of the following:
(A) Any liquid, hydrocolloid, animal-based substance,
thickener, sweetener, flavoring, synthetic product, propylene glycol,
vegetable glycerin, or other non-hemp-derived substance;
(B) Nicotine or tobacco; or
(C) Any amount of tetrahydrocannabinol as to create a
danger of misuse, overdose, accidental overconsumption, inaccurate dosage, or
other risk to the public.
(2) Medical devices, prescription drugs, or drugs otherwise
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration shall not be
considered hemp-derived products.
(e) The business of handling, receiving, possessing, storing,
distributing, taking orders for, soliciting orders of, selling, offering for
sale, and dealing in, through sale, barter, or exchange, hemp-derived
products is declared to be a privilege under the Arkansas Constitution and
laws of the State of Arkansas.

20-56-404. Permits.
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(a)(1) Each person listed in this section, before commencing business,
or if already in business, before continuing business, shall pay an annual
privilege fee and secure a permit from the Director of Arkansas Tobacco
Control.
(2) A person purchasing an existing permitted retail location
may, with the permission of the seller and Arkansas Tobacco Control, operate
under the selling owner's permit for no more than thirty (30) days from the
date of the sale.
(b)(1) In addition to securing a permit under subsection (a) of this
section, a manufacturer whose products are sold in this state shall register
with the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.
(2) A wholesaler of hemp-derived products shall secure the
proper wholesale permit.
(3) Every retailer of hemp-derived products that operates a
place of business shall secure the proper retail permit.
(c)(1) Permits shall be issued as follows:
(A) A permit for a sole proprietorship is issued in the
owner's name and in the fictitious business name, if any;
(B)(i) A permit for a partnership or limited liability
company is issued in the name of:
(a) The managing partner or managing member;
and
(b) The partnership or limited liability
company.
(ii) If the managing partner or managing member of a
limited liability company is a partnership, limited liability company, or
corporation, then the permit shall be issued in the name of:
(a) The president or chief executive officer;
and
(b) The partnership or limited liability
company; and
(C) A permit for a publicly traded or nonpublicly traded
corporation is issued in the name of the president or chief executive officer
of the corporation and in the name of the corporation.
(2) It is a violation for a permitted entity not to provide
written notification to the director within thirty (30) days of a change in
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
the following:
(A) The managing partner, limited liability company
managing member, or president or chief executive officer of a corporation,
partnership, or limited liability company; or
(B) The stockholders effecting twenty-five percent (25%)
or more of the total voting shares of a nonpublicly traded corporation.
(d)(1) When an entity transfers a business permitted under this
subchapter, the entity to which the business is transferred:
(A) Shall apply for a new permit under this subchapter;
(B) May be issued a new permit under this subchapter; and
(C) May operate under the selling entity's permit for no
more than thirty (30) days from the date of the sale.
(2) When a partnership or limited liability company permitted
under this subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the managing partner,
managing member, president, or chief executive officer:
(A) The existing permit issued under this subchapter is
void; and
(B) The partnership or limited liability company:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no more
than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or replacement of
the managing partner, managing member, president, or chief executive officer.
(3) When a nonpublicly traded corporation permitted under this
subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the president or chief executive
officer named on the permit or changes, removes, or replaces a stockholder
who owns fifty percent (50%) or more of the total voting shares of the
nonpublicly traded corporation's stock:
(A) The permit issued under this subchapter is void; and
(B) The nonpublicly traded corporation:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no more
than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or replacement of
the president, chief executive officer, or stockholder.
(4) When a publicly traded corporation permitted under this
subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the president or chief executive
officer named on the permit or changes, removes, or replaces a stockholder
who owns fifty percent (50%) or more of the total voting shares of the
publicly traded corporation's stock:
(A) The permit issued under this subchapter is void; and
(B) The publicly traded corporation:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no more
than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or replacement of
the president, chief executive officer, or stockholder.
(e) An entity may apply for and be issued a permit under this
subchapter in advance of the effective date of the permit to facilitate
continuity of business operations.

20-56-405. Permits — Location — Background check required.
(a) A retail, wholesale, or manufacturer permit shall not be issued to
a residential address, a mobile structure or vehicle, or for an address not
zoned appropriately for the business seeking to secure the permit.
(b) A permit shall not be issued to:
(1) A person who has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or
been found guilty of a felony; or
(2) A business owned or operated, in whole or in part, by a
person who has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty of a
felony.
(c) Arkansas Tobacco Control shall conduct a criminal background check
on each permit applicant and application, utilizing its Arkansas Crime
Information Center access as a law enforcement agency, in accordance with §§
12-12-1008 — 12-12-1011.

03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
20-56-406. Permits — Annual privilege fees.
(a) The annual privilege fee for each permit authorized by this
subchapter is established as follows:
(1) Wholesale Hemp-derived Products Permit.............$5,000
(2) Retail Hemp-derived Products Permit.............$5,000
(3) Manufacturer Hemp-derived Products Permit.............$5,000
(b)(1) All permits issued under this subchapter shall expire on June
30 following the effective date of issuance.
(2)(A) Upon the failure to timely renew a permit issued under
this subchapter, a late fee of two (2) times the amount of the appropriate
permit fee shall be owed in addition to the annual privilege fee for the
permit.
(B) An expired permit that is not renewed before September
1 following the expiration of the permit shall not be renewed, and the holder
of the expired permit shall submit an application for a new permit.
(3) A permit shall not be issued to the applicant until the late
fee and the permit fee have been paid.
(c) A permit issued under this subchapter shall not be renewed for a
permit holder who is delinquent more than ninety (90) days on a privilege
fee, tax relating to the sale or dispensing of hemp-derived products, or any
other state and local tax due to the Secretary of the Department of Finance
and Administration.
(d) A person who is delinquent more than ninety (90) days on a state
or local tax may not renew or obtain a permit issued under this subchapter
except upon certification that the permit holder has entered into a repayment
agreement with the Department of Finance and Administration and is current on
the payments.
(e) A permit holder who has unpaid fees, civil penalties, or an
unserved permit suspension may not transfer, sell, or give hemp-derived
product inventory of the business associated with the permit to a third party
until all fees and civil penalties are paid in full and all suspensions are
completed successfully, nor shall any third party be issued a new permit for
the business location.
(f) Each manufacturer, wholesaler, and retailer shall retain copies of
all invoices for the purchase or sale of any hemp-derived products for a
period of at least ten (10) years subject to examination by the Secretary of
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
the Department of Finance and Administration and the Director of Arkansas
Tobacco Control or their authorized agents upon demand at any time during
regular business hours.
(g) A retailer shall:
(1) Maintain copies of at least the last three hundred sixty-
five (365) days of hemp-derived product invoices, which the retailer shall
provide immediately upon demand;
(2)(A) Make the invoices that are older than three hundred
sixty-five (365) days available upon demand at any time during normal
business hours in the retail store.
(B) Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2)(C) of this
section, an agent of Arkansas Tobacco Control may determine a reasonable time
frame for which invoices are to be provided under subdivision (g)(2)(A) of
this section.
(C) An invoice that is provided seventy-two (72) hours or
more after the demand shall not be considered for purposes of determining a
violation of this subsection;
(3) Retain invoices for all hemp-derived products in the retail
store even if the invoice for the hemp-derived products is older than three
(3) years;
(4) Maintain a copy of the signed server awareness forms for
each employee of the retailer who engages in the sale of hemp-derived
products, which the retailer shall provide immediately upon demand;
(5)(A) Maintain a copy of any complete transfer forms showing:
(i) The hemp-derived products that were transferred;
(ii) The permitted location from which the hemp-
derived products were transferred; and
(iii) When the transfer occurred.
(B) A transfer form shall be completed contemporaneously
with the transfer and shall be provided immediately by the retailer upon
demand; and
(6) If any inventory was submitted with a permit application,
maintain a copy of the submitted inventory form, which the retailer shall
provide immediately upon demand.
(h) A wholesaler and manufacturer shall:
(1) Maintain ten (10) years of hemp-derived product invoices
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
that are available upon demand during normal business hours in the permitted
location; and
(2) Permit Arkansas Tobacco Control and authorized personnel of
Arkansas Tobacco Control to enter into and inspect stock of hemp-derived
products, and any documents and records relating to receipts and
disbursements of hemp-derived products.
(i) An invoice from a wholesaler to a retailer shall contain the name
or other identifying information of the wholesaler and the retailer.
(j)(1) A nonresident wholesaler shall also keep a record of all hemp-
derived products purchased for distribution within this state.
(2) All books, records, and memoranda pertaining to the purchase
and sale of the hemp-derived products under subdivision (j)(1) of this
section shall be subject to inspection by Arkansas Tobacco Control.
(k) Authorized personnel of Arkansas Tobacco Control shall not release
to the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board or to the public any information
identifying customers of the manufacturer, wholesaler, or warehouse except
when necessary to notify the board of alleged violations of this subchapter.

20-56-407. Permits — Not transferable — Duplicates.
(a) A permit under this subchapter is not:
(1) Transferable to a subsequent owner or operator; or
(2) Transferable to a different physical location unless the
permit holder obtains permission from the Director of Arkansas Tobacco
Control.
(b) A person purchasing an existing permitted retail location may
operate under the selling owner's permit for no more than thirty (30) days
from the date of the sale.
(c) When a permit is lost by a permit holder, a duplicate permit may
be issued upon application and for a fee of five dollars ($5.00) when
sufficient proof has been given to the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control.

20-56-408. Permits — Suspension or revocation.
(a) All permits issued under this subchapter shall be suspended or
revoked by the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control for any violation of this
subchapter or the rules pertaining to this subchapter, subject to a hearing
before the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board at the next regularly scheduled
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
board meeting.
(b) The director may revoke all permits to deal in hemp-derived
products associated with any person who is convicted of or pleads guilty or
nolo contendere to criminally violating this subchapter, subject to a hearing
before the board at the next regularly scheduled board meeting.

20-56-409. Advertising prohibitions and packaging requirements.
(a) A hemp-derived product distributed or offered for sale in this
state shall include the following information on the product label or product
packaging:
(1) The name of the hemp-derived product manufacturer, whether
in-state or out-of-state, and distributor, whether in-state or out-of-state;
(2) Product labeling clearly showing that the product contains
material derived from hemp and not marijuana or medical marijuana; and
(3) Any other marking, words, statement, or symbol as required
by Arkansas Tobacco Control through rules.
(b) A person shall not advertise, market, or offer for sale in this
state any hemp-derived product by using, in the labeling or design of the
product, its packaging, or in its advertising or marketing materials, trade
dress, trademarks, branding, or other related imagery that:
(1) Imitates or replicates those of food brands or other related
products that are marketed to or are commonly associated with children or
minors, including without limitation breakfast cereal, cookies, juice drinks,
soft drinks, frozen drinks, ice creams, sorbets, sherbets, and frozen pops;
(2) Depicts or signifies characters or symbols that are known to
a reasonable person to appeal primarily to or are commonly associated with
children or minors, including without limitation superheroes, cartoons or
cartoon characters, including anime characters, comic book characters, video
game characters, television show characters, movie characters, mythical
creatures, unicorns, or that otherwise incorporates related imagery or
scenery; or
(3) Uses the terms “candy”, “candies”, “cake”, “cakes”, “pies”,
or “cupcakes” or any variant of these terms, or any other term referencing a
type or brand of candy, cakes, pastries, or pies, including types or brands
of candy, cakes, pastries, or pies that do not include the words “candy”,
“candies”, “cake”, “cakes”, “pies”, or “cupcakes” in their names, labels, or
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
slogans.

20-56-410. Testing.
(a) All hemp-derived products sold in this state shall be tested by an
approved laboratory.
(b) An approved laboratory shall be an independent third-party
laboratory.
(c) A hemp-derived product sold in this state shall be tested for the
following and marked as to the hemp-derived product chemical makeup before
being sold to consumers:
(1) Cannabinoid profile;
(2) Solvents;
(3) Pesticides;
(4) Microbials;
(5) Heavy metals; and
(6) Any non-hemp-based substance.
(d) A hemp-derived product shall not be distributed or sold in this
state without a certificate of analysis from an approved laboratory that
confirms:
(1) The hemp-derived product was tested by an approved
laboratory;
(2) A tested representative sample of the hemp-derived product
contained a total delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that did not
exceed three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) under this subchapter; and
(3) A detailed analysis and list of chemical makeup of the
tested hemp-derived product under subsection (c) of this section.
(e) Arkansas Tobacco Control may periodically sample, analyze, and
test any hemp-derived product located in this state.
(f) The Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control shall:
(1) Investigate and issue subpoenas to any permittee or approved
laboratory used by a permittee that the director has reasonable suspicion of
intentionally producing falsified test results on hemp-derived products; and
(2) Promulgate rules for the enforcement of this section and set
penalties for any violation of the rules.

20-56-411. Providing minors with hemp-derived products — Purchase,
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
use, or possession prohibited.
(a)(1) It is unlawful for any person to give, barter, or sell to a
minor a hemp-derived product.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(3) of this section, a
person who pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of
violating subdivision (a)(1) of this section is guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
(3) An employee or owner of a retail location permitted under
this subchapter who violates subdivision (a)(1) of this section while inside
the retail location upon conviction is subject to a fine not to exceed one
hundred dollars ($100) per violation.
(b)(1) It is unlawful for a minor to:
(A) Use or possess or to purchase or attempt to purchase a
hemp-derived product; or
(B) For the purpose of obtaining or attempting to obtain a
hemp-derived product, falsely represent himself or herself not to be a minor
by displaying proof of age that is false, fraudulent, or not actually proof
of the minor's age.
(2) Any hemp-derived product found in the possession of a minor
may be confiscated and destroyed by a law enforcement officer.
(c)(1) It is not an offense under subsection (b) of this section if:
(A) The minor was acting at the direction of an authorized
agent of Arkansas Tobacco Control to enforce or ensure compliance with laws
relating to the prohibition of the sale of hemp-derived product to minors;
(B) The minor was acting at the direction of an authorized
agent of the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the
Department of Human Services to compile statistical data relating to the sale
of hemp-derived products to minors;
(C) The minor was acting at the request of a permit holder
to assist the permit holder by performing a check on the permit holder's own
retail business to see if the permit holder's employees would sell hemp-
derived products to the minor; or
(D) The minor was acting as an agent of a retail permit
holder within the scope of employment.
(2) A minor performing activities under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section shall:
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(A) Display the appearance of a minor;
(B) Have the written consent of the minor's parent or
guardian to perform the activity on file with the agency utilizing the minor;
and
(C)(i) Present a true and correct identification if asked.
(ii) Any failure on the part of a minor to provide
true and correct identification upon request is a defense to any action under
this section or a civil action under § 26-57-256.
(d) Any person who sells hemp-derived products has the right to deny
the sale of any hemp-derived product to any person.
(e) It is unlawful for any person who has been issued a permit or a
license under this subchapter to fail to display in a conspicuous place a
sign indicating that the sale of hemp-derived products to or purchase or
possession of hemp-derived products by a minor is prohibited by law.
(f) It is unlawful for any manufacturer whose hemp-derived product is
distributed in this state and any person who has been issued a permit or
license under this subchapter to distribute a free sample of any hemp-derived
product, or any component of a hemp-derived product or coupon that entitles
the holder of the coupon to any free sample of any hemp-derived product, or
any component of a hemp-derived product:
(1) In or on any public street or sidewalk within five hundred
feet (500′) of any playground, public school, or other facility when the
playground, public school, or other facility is being used primarily by
minors for recreational, educational, or other purposes; or
(2) To any minor.
(g) It is unlawful for any person that has been issued a permit or
license under this subchapter to:
(1) Sell or distribute a hemp-derived product through a self-
service display, a vending machine, or an order executed solely over the
internet or similar means; or
(2) Advertise or promote hemp-derived products in a manner that
is intended to appeal to children.
(h) Any retail permit holder or license holder who violates any
provision in this section is deemed guilty of a violation and subject to
penalties under § 26-57-256.
(i)(1) A notice of an alleged violation of this section shall be given
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
to the holder of a retail permit or license or an agent of the holder within
ten (10) days of the alleged violation.
(2)(A) The notice under subdivision (i)(1) of this section shall
contain the date and time of the alleged violation.
(B)(i) The notice under subdivision (i)(1) of this section
shall also include either the name of the person making the alleged sale or
information reasonably necessary to determine the location in the store that
allegedly made the sale.
(ii) When appropriate, information under subdivision
(i)(2)(B)(i) of this section should include, but not be limited to, the:
(a) Cash register number of the sale in the
store;
(b) Physical location of the sale in the
store; and
(c) If possible, the lane or aisle number of
the sale in the store.
(j) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (h) of this section,
the court shall consider the following factors when reviewing a possible
violation:
(1) The business has adopted and enforced a written policy
against selling hemp-derived products to minors;
(2) The business has informed its employees of the applicable
laws regarding the sale of hemp-derived products to minors;
(3) The business has required employees to verify the age of a
customer attempting to purchase a hemp-derived product by way of photographic
identification;
(4) The business has established and imposed disciplinary
sanctions for noncompliance; and
(5) That the appearance of the purchaser of the hemp-derived
product was such that an ordinary prudent person would believe him or her to
be of legal age to make the purchase.
(k) A person convicted of violating any provision of this section
whose permit or license to distribute or sell a hemp-derived product is
suspended or revoked upon conviction shall surrender to the court any permit
or license to distribute or sell a hemp-derived product, and the court shall
transmit the permit or license to distribute or sell a hemp-derived product
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
to the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control:
(1) To suspend or revoke the person's permit or license to
distribute or sell a hemp-derived product and to not renew the permit or
license; and
(2) Not to issue any new permit or license to that person for
the period of time determined by the court in accordance with this section.

20-56-412. Enforcement — Penalties.
(a) It is the duty of all state, county, and city officers to assist
Arkansas Tobacco Control in enforcing this subchapter.
(b) A person within the jurisdiction of this state who is not
permitted to sell hemp-derived products to retailers or consumers and who
sells, takes orders from, delivers, or causes to be delivered immediately or
in the future any hemp-derived products to retailers or consumers in the
State of Arkansas is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) A person engaged in buying or selling hemp-derived products in
this state without first obtaining the proper permit upon conviction is
guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(d) This subchapter does not prohibit in any form the continuous
transportation through Arkansas of the plant Cannabis sativa L., and any part
of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts,
cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or
not, with a total delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than
three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry-weight basis, from one licensed
hemp producer in another state to a licensed hemp handler in another state.

20-56-413. Rules.
The Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control and Arkansas Tobacco Control
may promulgate rules for the proper enforcement of their powers and duties
under this subchapter, including without limitation the regulation of
processing, transportation, delivery, sale, and purchase of hemp-derived
products in accordance with this subchapter and the power to levy penalties
for violations of this subchapter.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 26-57-247(b), effective until the
contingency in Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, concerning those unstamped
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
and untaxed items that may be seized by the Director of Arkansas Tobacco
Control, is amended to add an additional subdivision read as follows:
(5) Hemp products are possessed, sold, or offered for sale in
violation of § 20-56-501 et seq.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 26-57-247, effective if the contingency in
Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, is repealed.
26-57-247. Seizure, forfeiture, and disposition of tobacco products
and other property.
(a) Cigarettes to which stamps have not been affixed as provided by
law are subject to seizure and shall be held as evidence for prosecution.
(b) The Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control may seize and hold for
disposition of the courts or the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board all tobacco
products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, e-liquid products,
or hemp-derived products found in the possession of a person dealing in, or a
consumer of, tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products,
e-liquid products, or hemp-derived products if:
(1) Prima facie evidence exists that the full amount of excise
tax due on the tobacco products has not been paid to the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration;
(2) Tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine
products, or e-liquid products are in the possession of a wholesaler who does
not possess a current Arkansas wholesale permit;
(3) A retail establishment does not possess a current Arkansas
retail permit;
(4) The tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine
products, or e-liquid products have been offered for sale to the public at
another location without a current Arkansas retail permit; or
(5) Hemp-derived products are possessed, sold, or offered for
sale in violation of § 20-56-401 et seq.
(c) Property, including money, used to facilitate a violation of this
subchapter or the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-701 et seq., may be
seized and forfeited to the state.
(d)(1) A prosecuting attorney may institute a civil action against a
person who is convicted of a criminal violation under this subchapter or the
Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-701 et seq., to obtain a judgment for:
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(A) Damages in an amount equal to the value of the
property, funds, or a monetary instrument involved in the violation;
(B) The proceeds acquired by a person involved in the
enterprise or by reason of conduct in furtherance of the violation; and
(C) Costs incurred by Arkansas Tobacco Control in the
investigation, prosecution, and adjudication of criminal, civil, and
administrative proceedings.
(2) The standard of proof in an action brought under subdivision
(d)(1) of this section is preponderance of the evidence.
(e) The following are subject to forfeiture under this section upon
order by a circuit court:
(1) Tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine
products, or e-liquid products distributed, dispensed, or acquired in
violation of this subchapter;
(2) Raw materials, products, or equipment used or intended for
use in manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing, or
exporting a tobacco product, vapor product, alternative nicotine product, or
e-liquid product in violation of this subchapter;
(3) Property that is used or intended for use as a container for
property described in subdivision (e)(1) or subdivision (e)(2) of this
section;
(4)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(4)(B) of this
section, a conveyance, including an aircraft, vehicle, or vessel, that is
used or intended to be used to transport or in any manner to facilitate the
transportation for the purpose of sale or receipt of property described in
subdivision (e)(1) or subdivision (e)(2) of this section.
(B)(i) A conveyance used by a person as a common carrier
in the transaction of business as a common carrier is not subject to
forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the owner or other
person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a
violation of this subchapter.
(ii) A conveyance is not subject to forfeiture under
this section by reason of an act or omission established by the owner of the
conveyance to have been committed or omitted without his or her knowledge or
consent.
(C) Upon a showing described in subdivision (e)(4)(B)(i)
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
of this section by the owner or interest holder of a conveyance, the
conveyance may nevertheless be forfeited if the prosecuting attorney
establishes that the owner or interest holder either knew or should
reasonably have known that the conveyance would be used to transport or in
any manner to facilitate the transportation for the purpose of sale or
receipt of property described in subdivision (e)(1) or subdivision (e)(2) of
this section.
(D) A conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security
interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party
neither had knowledge of nor consented to an act or omission in violation of
this subchapter;
(5) A book, record, or research product or material, including a
formula, microfilm, tape, or data that is used or intended for use in
violation of this subchapter;
(6)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(6)(B) of this
section, a thing of value, including:
(i) Firearms purchased from the proceeds of the sale
of untaxed tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products,
or e-liquid products in violation of this subchapter or used in furtherance
of a criminal offense as described in § 26-57-245;
(ii) Proceeds or profits traceable to an exchange
described in subdivision (e)(6)(A)(i) of this section; and
(iii) Money, negotiable instruments, or security used
or intended to be used to facilitate a violation of this subchapter.
(B) Property shall not be forfeited under subdivision
(e)(6)(A) of this section to the extent of the interest of an owner by reason
of an act or omission established by him or her by a preponderance of the
evidence to have been committed or omitted without his or her knowledge or
consent;
(7)(A) Money, coins, or currency found in close proximity to a
forfeitable tobacco product, vapor product, alternative nicotine product, or
e-liquid product or a forfeitable record of an importation of a tobacco
product, vapor product, alternative nicotine product, or e-liquid product is
presumed to be forfeitable under this section.
(B) The burden of proof is upon a claimant of the money,
coins, or currency to rebut the presumption in subdivision (e)(7)(A) of this
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
section by a preponderance of the evidence; and
(8)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(8)(B) of this
section, real property if it substantially assisted in, facilitated in any
manner, or was used or intended for use in the commission of any act
prohibited by this subchapter.
(B)(i) Real property is not subject to forfeiture under
this section by reason of an act or omission established by the owner of the
real property by a preponderance of the evidence to have been committed or
omitted without his or her knowledge or consent.
(ii) A forfeiture of real property encumbered by a
mortgage or other lien is subject to the interest of the secured party if the
secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to an act or omission in
violation of this subchapter.
(iii) If the circuit court finds by a preponderance
of the evidence that grounds for a forfeiture exist under this section, the
court shall enter an order requiring the forfeiture of the real property.
(C) Upon an order of forfeiture of real property, the
order shall be filed on the day issued and shall have prospective effect.
(D) A forfeiture of real property does not affect the
title of a bona fide purchaser who purchased the real property before the
issuance of the order, and the order has no force or effect on the title of
the bona fide purchaser.
(E) A lis pendens filed in connection with an action
pending under this section that may result in the forfeiture of real property
is effective only from the time filed and has no retroactive effect.
(f) A tobacco product, vapor product, alternative nicotine product, or
e-liquid product that is possessed, transferred, sold, or offered for sale in
violation of this subchapter may be seized and immediately forfeited to the
state.
(g)(1) Property subject to forfeiture under this subchapter may be
seized by a law enforcement agent upon process issued by a circuit court
having jurisdiction over the property on petition filed by the prosecuting
attorney of the judicial circuit.
(2) Seizure without process may be made if:
(A) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under
a search warrant or an inspection under the regulatory authority of Arkansas
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
Tobacco Control;
(B) The property subject to seizure has been the subject
of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or
forfeiture proceeding based upon this subchapter;
(C) The seizing law enforcement agency has probable cause
to believe that the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or
safety; or
(D) The seizing law enforcement agency has probable cause
to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation
of this subchapter.
(h)(1) A state or local law enforcement agency shall not transfer
property seized by the state or local agency under this section to a federal
entity for forfeiture under federal law unless the circuit court having
jurisdiction over the property enters an order, upon petition by the
prosecuting attorney, authorizing the property to be transferred to the
federal entity.
(2) The transfer shall not be approved unless it reasonably
appears that the activity giving rise to the investigation or seizure
involves more than one (1) state or the nature of the investigation or
seizure would be better pursued under federal law.
(i)(1) Property seized for forfeiture under this section is not
subject to replevin but is deemed to be in the custody of the seizing law
enforcement agency subject only to an order or decree of the circuit court
having jurisdiction over the property seized.
(2) Subject to a need to retain the property as evidence, when
property is seized under this subchapter, the seizing law enforcement agency
may:
(A) Remove the property to a place designated by the
circuit court;
(B) Place the property under constructive seizure, posting
notice of pending forfeiture on it by:
(i) Giving notice of pending forfeiture to its
owners and interest holders; or
(ii) Filing notice of pending forfeiture in an
appropriate public record relating to the property;
(C) Remove the property to a storage area for safekeeping
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
or, if the property is a negotiable instrument or money or is not needed for
evidentiary purposes, deposit it into an interest-bearing account; or
(D) Provide for another agency or custodian, including an
owner, secured party, mortgagee, or lienholder, to take custody of the
property and service, maintain, and operate it as reasonably necessary to
maintain its value in an appropriate location within the jurisdiction of the
court.
(3)(A) In case of transfer of property, a transfer receipt shall
be prepared by the transferring agency.
(B) The transfer receipt shall:
(i) List a detailed and complete description of the
property being transferred;
(ii) State to whom the property is being transferred
and the source or authorization for the transfer; and
(iii) Be signed by both the transferor and the
transferee.
(C) Both transferor and transferee shall maintain a copy
of the transfer receipt.
(4) A person who acts as custodian of property under this
section is not liable to any person on account of an act done in a reasonable
manner in compliance with an order under this subchapter.
(j)(1) Property seized by a state or local law enforcement officer
under this section who is detached to, deputized or commissioned by, or
working in conjunction with a federal agency remains subject to this section.
(2)(A) If property is seized for forfeiture by a law enforcement
agency under this section, the seizing law enforcement officer shall prepare
and sign a confiscation report.
(B)(i) The party from whom the property is seized shall
also sign the confiscation report if present and shall immediately receive a
copy of the confiscation report.
(ii) If the party refuses to sign the confiscation
report, the confiscation report shall be signed by one (1) additional law
enforcement officer, stating that the party refused to sign the confiscation
report.
(C) The original confiscation report shall be:
(i) Filed with the seizing law enforcement agency
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
within forty-eight (48) hours after the seizure; and
(ii) Maintained in a separate file.
(D) One (1) copy of the confiscation report shall be
retained by the seizing law enforcement officer.
(3) The confiscation report shall contain the following
information:
(A) A detailed description of the property seized
including serial or model numbers and odometer or hour reading of vehicles or
equipment;
(B) The date of seizure;
(C) The name and address of the party from whom the
property was seized;
(D) The reason for the seizure;
(E) The location where the property will be held;
(F) The seizing law enforcement officer's name; and
(G) A signed statement by the seizing law enforcement
officer stating that the confiscation report is true and complete.
(4) Within three (3) business days after receiving the
confiscation report, the seizing law enforcement agency shall forward a copy
of the confiscation report to the prosecuting attorney for the district where
the property was seized and to the director.
(5)(A) Arkansas Legislative Audit shall notify the director and
a circuit court in the county of a law enforcement agency, prosecuting
attorney, or other public entity that the law enforcement agency, prosecuting
attorney, or public entity is ineligible to receive forfeited funds,
forfeited property, or grants from the council, if Arkansas Legislative Audit
determines by its own investigation or upon written notice from the director
that:
(i) The law enforcement agency failed to complete
and file the confiscation reports as required by this section;
(ii) The law enforcement agency, prosecuting
attorney, or public entity has not properly accounted for the seized
property; or
(iii) The prosecuting attorney has failed to comply
with the notification requirement set forth in subdivision (m)(2) of this
section.
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(B) After the notice, the circuit court shall not issue an
order distributing seized property to that law enforcement agency,
prosecuting attorney, or public entity, nor shall a grant be awarded by the
council to that law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or public
entity until:
(i) The appropriate officials of the law enforcement
agency, prosecuting attorney, or public entity have appeared before the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee; and
(ii) The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee has
adopted a motion authorizing subsequent transfers of forfeited property to
the law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or public entity.
(C)(i) If a law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney,
or other public entity is ineligible to receive forfeited property, the
circuit court shall order money that would have been distributed to that law
enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or public entity to be transmitted
to the Treasurer of State for deposit into the Special State Assets
Forfeiture Fund.
(ii) If the property is not cash, the circuit court
shall order the property converted to cash under this section and the
proceeds transmitted to the Treasurer of State for deposit into the Special
State Assets Forfeiture Fund.
(D) Moneys deposited into the Special State Assets
Forfeiture Fund are not subject to recovery or retrieval by an ineligible law
enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or other public entity.
(6) The director shall establish by rule a standardized
confiscation report form to be used by all law enforcement agencies, with
specific instructions and guidelines concerning the nature and dollar value
of all property, including firearms, to be included in the confiscation
report and forwarded to the office of the local prosecuting attorney and the
director under this subsection.
(k)(1)(A) The prosecuting attorney shall initiate forfeiture
proceedings by filing a complaint with the circuit clerk of the county where
the property was seized and by serving the complaint on all known owners and
interest holders of the seized property in accordance with the Arkansas Rules
of Civil Procedure.
(B) The complaint may be based on in rem or in personam
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
jurisdiction but shall not be filed to avoid the distribution requirements
set forth in subdivision (l)(1) of this section.
(C) The prosecuting attorney shall mail a copy of the
complaint to the director within five (5) calendar days after filing the
complaint.
(2)(A) The complaint shall include a copy of the confiscation
report and shall be filed within sixty (60) days after receiving a copy of
the confiscation report from the seizing law enforcement agency.
(B) In a case involving real property, the complaint shall
be filed within sixty (60) days of the defendant's conviction on the charge
giving rise to the forfeiture.
(3)(A) The prosecuting attorney may file the complaint after the
expiration of the time only if the complaint is accompanied by a statement of
good cause for the late filing.
(B) However, the complaint shall not be filed more than
one hundred twenty (120) days after either the date of the seizure or, in a
case involving real property, the date of the defendant's conviction.
(C)(i) If the circuit court determines that good cause has
not been established, the circuit court shall order that the seized property
be returned to the owner or interest holder.
(ii) In addition, items seized but not subject to
forfeiture under this section or subject to disposition under law or the
Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure may be ordered returned to the owner or
interest holder.
(iii) If the owner or interest holder cannot be
determined, the court may order disposition of the property.
(4) Within the time set forth in the Arkansas Rules of Civil
Procedure, the owner or interest holder of the seized property shall file
with the circuit clerk a verified answer to the complaint that shall include:
(A) A statement describing the seized property and the
owner's interest or interest holder's interest in the seized property with
supporting documents to establish the owner's interest or interest holder's
interest;
(B) A certification by the owner or interest holder
stating that he or she has read the document and that it has not been filed
for an improper purpose;
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(C) A statement setting forth any defense to forfeiture;
and
(D) The address at which the owner or interest holder will
accept mail.
(5)(A) If the owner or interest holder fails to file an answer,
the prosecuting attorney may move for default judgment under the Arkansas
Rules of Civil Procedure.
(B)(i) If a timely answer has been filed, the prosecuting
attorney has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that
the seized property should be forfeited.
(ii) After the prosecuting attorney has presented
proof, an owner or interest holder of the property seized is allowed to
present evidence showing why the seized property should not be forfeited.
(iii) If the circuit court determines that grounds
for forfeiting the seized property exist and that a defense to forfeiture has
not been established by the owner or interest holder, the circuit court shall
enter an order under this section. However, if the circuit court determines
either that the prosecuting attorney has failed to establish that grounds for
forfeiting the seized property exist or that the owner or interest holder has
established a defense to forfeiture, the court shall order that the seized
property be immediately returned to the owner or interest holder.
(l)(1) If the circuit court having jurisdiction over the seized
property finds upon a hearing by a preponderance of the evidence that grounds
for a forfeiture exist under this subchapter, the circuit court shall enter
an order:
(A) To permit the law enforcement agency or prosecuting
attorney to retain the seized property for law enforcement or prosecutorial
purposes, subject to the following provisions:
(i)(a) Seized property may not be retained for
official use for more than three (3) years, unless the circuit court finds
that the seized property has been used for law enforcement or prosecutorial
purposes and authorizes continued use for those purposes on an annual basis.
(b) At the end of the retention period, the
seized property shall be sold and eighty percent (80%) of the proceeds shall
be deposited into the tobacco control fund of the retaining law enforcement
agency or prosecuting attorney, and twenty percent (20%) of the proceeds
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues to be credited
to the Special State Assets Forfeiture Fund.
(c) The retaining law enforcement agency or
prosecuting attorney may sell the retained seized property during the time
allowed for retention. However, the proceeds of the sale shall be distributed
as set forth in subdivision (l)(1)(A)(i)(b) of this section;
(ii) If the circuit court determines that retained
seized property has been used for personal use or by non-law enforcement
personnel for non-law enforcement purposes, the circuit court shall order the
seized property to be sold under § 5-5-101(e) and (f), and the proceeds shall
be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues to be credited to
the Special State Assets Forfeiture Fund;
(iii)(a) A law enforcement agency may use
forfeited property or money if the circuit court's order specifies that the
forfeited property or money is forfeited to the prosecuting attorney,
sheriff, chief of police, Division of Arkansas State Police, director, or
Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas Department of
Transportation.
(b) After the order, the prosecuting attorney,
sheriff, chief of police, Division of Arkansas State Police, director, or
Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas Department of Transportation
shall maintain an inventory of the forfeited property or money, be
accountable for the forfeited property or money, and be subject to
subdivision (j)(5) of this section with respect to the forfeited property or
money;
(iv)(a) An aircraft is forfeited to the office
of the director and may be used only for tobacco, vapor product, alternative
nicotine product, or e-liquid product smuggling interdiction efforts within
the discretion of the director.
(b) However, if the director determines that
the aircraft should be sold, the proceeds of the sale shall be distributed as
set forth in subdivision (l)(1)(A)(i)(b) of this section;
(v) A firearm not retained for official use shall be
disposed of in accordance with state and federal law; and
(vi) A tobacco product, vapor product, alternative
nicotine product, or e-liquid product shall be destroyed pursuant to a court
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
order;
(B)(i) To sell seized property that is not required by law
to be destroyed and that is not harmful to the public.
(ii) Seized property described in subdivision
(l)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall be sold at a public sale by the retaining
law enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney under § 5-5-101(e) and (f); or
(C) To transfer a motor vehicle to a school district for
use in a driver education course.
(2) Disposition of forfeited property under this subsection is
subject to the need to retain the forfeited property as evidence in any
related proceeding.
(3) Within three (3) business days after the entry of the order,
the circuit clerk shall forward to the director copies of the confiscation
report, the circuit court's order, and other documentation detailing the
disposition of the seized property.
(m)(1)(A) Subject to subdivision (j)(5) of this section, the proceeds
of sales conducted under this section and moneys forfeited or obtained by
judgment or settlement under this subchapter shall be deposited and
distributed in the manner provided in this subsection.
(B) Moneys received from a federal forfeiture for a
violation of this subchapter shall be deposited and distributed under this
section.
(2)(A) The proceeds of a sale and moneys forfeited or obtained
by judgment or settlement under this subchapter shall be deposited into the
asset forfeiture fund of the prosecuting attorney and is subject to the
following provisions:
(i) If, during a calendar year, the aggregate amount
of moneys deposited into the asset forfeiture fund exceeds twenty thousand
dollars ($20,000) per county, the prosecuting attorney, within fourteen (14)
days after that time, shall notify the circuit judges in the judicial
district and the director;
(ii) Subsequent to the notification set forth in this
section, twenty percent (20%) of the proceeds of an additional sale and
additional moneys forfeited or obtained by judgment or settlement under this
subchapter in the same calendar year shall be deposited into the State
Treasury as special revenues to be credited to the Special State Assets
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
Forfeiture Fund, and the remainder shall be deposited into the asset
forfeiture fund of the prosecuting attorney;
(iii) Failure by the prosecuting attorney to comply
with the notification requirement set forth in this section renders the
prosecuting attorney and an entity eligible to receive forfeited moneys or
property from the prosecuting attorney ineligible to receive forfeited moneys
or property, except as provided in this section; and
(iv) Twenty percent (20%) of moneys in excess of
twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) that have been retained but not reported as
required by this section are subject to recovery for deposit into the Special
State Assets Forfeiture Fund.
(B) The prosecuting attorney shall administer expenditures
from the asset forfeiture fund, which is subject to audit by Arkansas
Legislative Audit. Moneys distributed from the asset forfeiture fund shall be
used only for law enforcement and prosecutorial purposes. Moneys in the asset
forfeiture fund shall be distributed in the following order:
(i) For the satisfaction of a bona fide security
interest or lien;
(ii) For payment of a proper expense of the
proceeding for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure,
maintenance of custody, advertising, and court costs;
(iii) Any balance under three hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($350,000) shall be distributed proportionally so as to reflect
generally the contribution of the appropriate local or state law enforcement
or prosecutorial agency's participation in any activity that led to the
seizure or forfeiture of the property or deposit of moneys under this
subchapter; and
(iv) Any balance over three hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($350,000) shall be forwarded to the director to be transferred to
the State Treasury for deposit into the Special State Assets Forfeiture Fund
for distribution under this section.
(C)(i) For a forfeiture in an amount greater than three
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) from which expenses are paid for a
proceeding for forfeiture and sale under this section, an itemized accounting
of the expenses shall be delivered to the director within ten (10) calendar
days after the distribution of the funds.
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(ii) The itemized accounting shall include the
expenses paid, to whom paid, and for what purposes the expenses were paid.
(3)(A) Moneys received by a prosecuting attorney or law
enforcement agency from a federal forfeiture for a violation of this
subchapter shall be deposited and maintained in a separate account.
(B) However, a balance over three hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($350,000) shall be distributed as required under this section.
(4) Other moneys shall not be maintained in the account except
for interest income generated by the account.
(5) Moneys in the account shall only be used for law enforcement
and prosecutorial purposes consistent with governing federal law.
(6) The account is subject to audit by Arkansas Legislative
Audit.
(7) A balance over three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) shall be transferred to the State Treasury for deposit into the
Special State Assets Forfeiture Fund in which it shall be maintained
separately and distributed consistently with governing federal law and upon
the advice of the director.
(n) In personam jurisdiction may be based on a person's presence in
the state or on his or her conduct in the state, as set out in § 16-4-101(C),
and is subject to the following additional provisions:
(1) A temporary restraining order under this section may be
entered ex parte on application of the state upon a showing that:
(A) There is probable cause to believe that the property
with respect to which the order is sought is subject to forfeiture under this
section; and
(B) Notice of the action would jeopardize the availability
of the property for forfeiture;
(2)(A) Notice of the entry of a temporary restraining order and
an opportunity for hearing shall be afforded to a person known to have an
interest in the property.
(B) The hearing shall be held at the earliest possible
date consistent with Rule 65 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure and is
limited to the issues of whether:
(i) There is a probability that the state will
prevail on the issue of forfeiture and that failure to enter the temporary
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
restraining order will result in the property's being destroyed, conveyed,
alienated, encumbered, disposed of, received, removed from the jurisdiction
of the circuit court, concealed, or otherwise made unavailable for
forfeiture; and
(ii) The need to preserve the availability of
property through the entry of the requested temporary restraining order
outweighs the hardship on an owner or interest holder against whom the
temporary restraining order is to be entered;
(3) The state has the burden of proof by a preponderance of the
evidence to show that the defendant's property is subject to forfeiture;
(4)(A) On a determination of liability of a person for conduct
giving rise to forfeiture under this section, the circuit court shall enter a
judgment of forfeiture of the property subject to forfeiture as alleged in
the complaint and may authorize the prosecuting attorney or a law enforcement
officer to seize property subject to forfeiture under this section not
previously seized or not then under seizure.
(B) The order of forfeiture shall be consistent with
subsection (l) of this section.
(C) In connection with the judgment, on application of the
state, the circuit court may enter an appropriate order to protect the
interest of the state in property ordered forfeited; and
(5) Subsequent to the finding of liability and order of
forfeiture, the following procedures apply:
(A) The attorney for the state shall give notice of
pending forfeiture in the manner provided in Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of
Civil Procedure to an owner or interest holder who has not previously been
given notice;
(B) An owner of or interest holder in property that has
been ordered forfeited and whose claim is not precluded may file a claim
within thirty (30) days after initial notice of pending forfeiture or after
notice under Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure, whichever is
earlier; and
(C) The circuit court may amend the in personam order of
forfeiture if the circuit court determines that a claimant has established
that he or she has an interest in the property and that the interest is
exempt under this section.
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
(o) The circuit court shall order the forfeiture of other property of
a claimant or defendant up to the value of the claimant's or defendant's
property found by the circuit court to be subject to forfeiture under this
section if any of the forfeitable property had remained under the control or
custody of the claimant or defendant and:
(1) Cannot be located;
(2) Was transferred or conveyed to, sold to, or deposited with a
third party;
(3) Is beyond the jurisdiction of the circuit court;
(4) Was substantially diminished in value while not in the
actual physical custody of the seizing law enforcement agency;
(5) Was commingled with other property that cannot be divided
without difficulty; or
(6) Is subject to interest exempted from forfeiture under this
subchapter.
(p)(1) There is created on the books of law enforcement agencies and
prosecuting attorneys a tobacco control fund.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys obtained under this section
and other revenue as may be provided by law or ordinance.
(3) Moneys in the tobacco control fund shall be appropriated on
a continuing basis and are not subject to the Revenue Stabilization Law, §
19-5-101 et seq.
(4)(A) The fund shall be used for law enforcement and
prosecutorial purposes.
(B) Each prosecuting attorney shall submit to the Director
of Arkansas Tobacco Control on or before June 30 of each year a report
detailing moneys received and expenditures made from the tobacco control fund
during the preceding twelve-month period.
(5) The law enforcement agencies and prosecuting attorneys shall
submit to the director on or before June 30 of each year a report detailing
any moneys received and expenditures made from the tobacco control fund
during the preceding twelve-month period.
(6) Moneys from the tobacco control fund may not supplant other
local, state, or federal funds.
(7) The tobacco control fund is subject to audit by Arkansas
Legislative Audit.
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 26-57-255(g)(3), effective until the
contingency in Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, concerning the powers and
duties of the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) Conduct public hearings when appropriate regarding a
permit authorized under this subchapter or in violation of this subchapter,
the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-701 et seq., § 5-27-227, § 20-56-501
et seq., or any other federal, state, or local statute, ordinance, rule, or
regulation concerning the sale of tobacco products, vapor products,
alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid products to minors, or the rules
promulgated by Arkansas Tobacco Control.
(B) After notice and hearing held in accordance with the
Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., if the board
finds a violation of this subchapter, the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-
701 et seq., § 20-56-501 et seq., or the rules promulgated by Arkansas
Tobacco Control, the board may suspend or revoke any or all permits issued by
the director to any person.
(C) The board may levy a civil penalty in an amount not to
exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation against a person
found to be in violation of this subchapter, the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act,
§ 4-75-701 et seq., § 20-56-501 et seq., or the rules promulgated by Arkansas
Tobacco Control.
(D) Each day of a violation is a separate violation.
(E) A civil penalty under subdivision (g)(3)(C) of this
section is in addition to any penalties levied by the board under § 26-57-
248.
(F) In conducting a hearing under this subdivision (g)(3),
the board may examine or cause to be examined under oath any witness and the
books and records of a permitted person or other person;

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 26-57-255, effective if the contingency in
Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, is repealed.
26-57-255. Arkansas Tobacco Control Board — Creation — Definition.
(a) There is created the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board to consist of
the following eight (8) members appointed by the Governor:
(1) Two (2) members of the board shall be wholesalers of tobacco
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid
products;
(2) Two (2) members of the board shall be retailers of tobacco
products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid
products; and
(3) Four (4) members of the board shall be members of the public
at large who are not public employees or officials, at least one (1) of whom
shall be an African-American, and two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the
Governor after consulting the Arkansas Medical Society, Inc. and subject to
confirmation by the Senate.
(b) The Governor shall designate which member of the board shall act
as chair and that person shall serve as chair for two (2) years unless his or
her membership on the board ceases prior to the end of the two-year period.
(c)(1) All members of the board shall be residents of the State of
Arkansas and confirmed by the Senate.
(2) The term of office shall be five (5) years.
(d)(1) A minimum of five (5) members is required for a quorum.
(2)(A) All action by the board shall be by a majority vote of
the board members present at the regular or special meeting, and the board
may take no official action in connection with a matter except at a regular
or special meeting.
(B) In the event of a tie vote of the members of the
board, the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control may cast the deciding vote.
(e) A person who is not a citizen of the United States and who has not
resided in the State of Arkansas for at least two (2) consecutive years
immediately preceding the date of appointment shall not be appointed to the
board.
(f) Each member of the board and the director shall take and subscribe
to an oath that he or she will support and enforce this subchapter, the
tobacco control laws of this state, the Arkansas Constitution, and the United
States Constitution.
(g) The board shall:
(1) Act as the adjudicatory body for Arkansas Tobacco Control;
(2) Have responsibility for approving the issuance, suspension,
and revocation of the permits enumerated in § 26-57-219;
(3)(A) Conduct public hearings when appropriate regarding a
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
permit authorized under this subchapter or in violation of this subchapter,
the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-701 et seq., § 5-27-227, § 20-56-401
et seq., or any other federal, state, or local statute, ordinance, rule, or
regulation concerning the sale of tobacco products, vapor products,
alternative nicotine products, e-liquid products, or hemp-derived products to
minors or the rules promulgated by Arkansas Tobacco Control.
(B) After notice and hearing held in accordance with the
Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., if the board
finds a violation of this subchapter, the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-
701 et seq., § 20-56-401 et seq., or the rules promulgated by Arkansas
Tobacco Control, the board may suspend or revoke any or all permits issued by
the director to any person.
(C) The board may levy a civil penalty in an amount not to
exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation against a person
found to be in violation of this subchapter, the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act,
§ 4-75-701 et seq., § 20-56-401 et seq., or the rules promulgated by Arkansas
Tobacco Control.
(D) Each day of a violation is a separate violation.
(E) A civil penalty under subdivision (g)(3)(C) of this
section is in addition to any penalties levied by the board under § 26-57-
248.
(F) In conducting a hearing under this subdivision (g)(3),
the board may examine or cause to be examined under oath any witness and the
books and records of a permitted person or other person;
(4) When requested by the written petition of at least three (3)
interested parties, conduct public hearings to receive testimony regarding
the facts relevant to the issuance of a permit under this subchapter; and
(5)(A) Not have authority in criminal prosecutions or the
assessment or collection of any taxes.
(B) However, the board shall refuse to approve the
issuance or renewal of a permit issued by the director for the failure to pay
taxes or fees imposed on tobacco products or any permit fees imposed under
this subchapter or any other state or local taxes.
(h)(1) The board may assess penalties for a violation of § 5-27-227
according to the following schedule:
(A) For a first violation within a forty-eight-month
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
period, a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250);
(B) For a second violation within a forty-eight-month
period, a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) and
suspension of the permit enumerated in § 26-57-219 for a period not to exceed
two (2) days;
(C) For a third violation within a forty-eight-month
period, a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) and
suspension of the permit enumerated in § 26-57-219 for a period not to exceed
seven (7) days;
(D) For a fourth or subsequent violation within a forty-
eight-month period, a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand dollars
($2,000) and suspension of the permit enumerated in § 26-57-219 for a period
not to exceed fourteen (14) days; and
(E) For a fifth or subsequent violation within a forty-
eight-month period, in addition to the other penalties provided under this
subsection, the permit enumerated in § 26-57-219 may be revoked.
(2)(A) A penalty under this subsection shall not be imposed on a
retailer or an agent or employee of a retailer who can establish an
affirmative defense that before the date of the violation the retailer or
agent or employee of the retailer furnishing the tobacco products, vapor
products, alternative nicotine products, e-liquid products, or cigarette
papers reasonably relied on proof of age that identified the person receiving
the tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, e-liquid
products, or cigarette papers as not being a minor.
(B) As used in this subsection, “proof of age” means valid
documentation issued by a governmental agency containing the person's
photograph, date of birth, and an expiration date.
(3)(A) For a corporation or business with more than one (1)
retail location, to determine the number of accumulated violations for
purposes of the penalty schedule stated in this subsection, violations of §
5-27-227 by one (1) retail location shall not be accumulated against other
retail locations of that same corporation or business.
(B) For a retail location, for purposes of the penalty
schedule stated in this subsection, violations accumulated and assessed
against a prior owner of the retail location shall not be accumulated against
a new owner of the same retail location unless approved by the board.
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 26-57-256(a)(2) and (3), effective until
the contingency in Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, concerning the powers of
Arkansas Tobacco Control, are amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Receive applications for and issue, refuse, suspend, and
revoke permits listed in § 26-57-219 and § 20-56-501 et seq.
(B) Arkansas Tobacco Control shall refuse to issue or
renew any permits issued by the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control for the
failure to pay:
(i) Any applicable taxes or fees imposed on tobacco
products,;
(ii) Permit permit fees imposed under this
subchapter and § 20-56-501 et seq.;, or
(iii) Any any other state or local taxes;
(3) Prescribe forms of applications for permits under this
subchapter and § 20-56-501 et seq;

SECTION 13. Uncodified Section 17 of Acts 2023, No. 629, which
reflects changes to the references to "Sections 6-14", and "Sections 2-5" in
Acts 2023, No. 629, §§ 16 and 17 made by the Arkansas Code Revision
Commission, is repealed.
SECTION 17. Contingent effective date.
Sections 6-14 [8-16] of this act shall become effective only upon the
certification of the Arkansas Attorney General that the State of Arkansas is
currently enjoined from enforcing Sections 2-5 [2-7] of this act relating to
delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol and delta-10 tetrahyrdocannabinol, but no
earlier than August 1, 2023.

SECTION 14. DO NOT CODIFY. Rules.
(a) When adopting the initial rules required under this act, Arkansas
Tobacco Control shall file the final rules with the Secretary of State for
adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(b) Arkansas Tobacco Control shall file the proposed rules with the
03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422

HB1722
Legislative Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1,
2026, so that the Legislative Council may consider the rules for approval
before January 1, 2026.

SECTION 15. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that minors in this state are
currently purchasing hemp-derived products without any regulations or testing
of the hemp-derived products; that minors are becoming ill when taking
synthetic drugs that they believe are hemp-derived products; and that this
act is immediately necessary to regulate the hemp-derived products, including
testing requirements, to ensure the health and safety of the minors of this
state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and
safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.
















03/10/2025 1:26:46 PM JMB422